test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aeqggwz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - äʼggõz: # Noun 182 'eng /est äke/fin' - full paradigm
     äʼggõz+N+Sg+Nom: [äʼggõz, äggõz]
     äʼggõz+N+Sg+Gen: [äʼggõ, äggõ]
     äʼggõz+N+Sg+Par: [äʼggõzt, äggõzt]
     äʼggõz+N+Sg+Dat: [äʼggõn, äggõn]
     äʼggõz+N+Sg+Ins: [äʼggõks, äggõks]
     äʼggõz+N+Sg+Ill: [äʼggõz, äʼggõ, äggõz, äggõ]
     äʼggõz+N+Sg+Ela: [äʼggõst, äggõst]
     äʼggõz+N+Pl+Nom: [äʼggõd, äggõd]
     äʼggõz+N+Pl+Gen: [äʼggõd, äggõd]
     äʼggõz+N+Pl+Par: [äʼggidi, äggidi]
     äʼggõz+N+Pl+Dat: [äʼggõdõn, äggõdõn]
     äʼggõz+N+Pl+Ins: [äʼggõdõks, äggõdõks]
     äʼggõz+N+Pl+Ill: [äʼggiž, äggiž]
     äʼggõz+N+Pl+Ela: [äʼggist, äggist]
